lt-LT: Motorinių transporto priemonių žemųjų dažnių garsiakalbių dydis: 10 col.; 12 col.; 13,5 col.; 15 col.; 18 col.; 6,5 col.; 8 col.; Kita
zh-TW: 機動車輛重低音喇叭尺寸: 10 吋; 12 吋; 13.5 吋; 15 吋; 18 吋; 6.5 吋; 8 吋; 其他
nb: Subwoofer-størrelse for motorkjøretøy: 10 tommer; 12 tommer; 13,5 tommer; 15 tommer; 18 tommer; 6,5 tommer; 8 tommer; Annet
pl: Rozmiar subwoofera do pojazdu silnikowego: 10 cali; 12 cali; 13,5 cala; 15 cali; 18 cali; 6,5 cala; 8 cali; Inne
ro-RO: Dimensiune a subwooferului auto: 10 in; 12 in; 13,5 in; 15 in; 18 in; 6,5 in; 8 in; Altele
sl-SI: Velikost nizkotonskega zvočnika motornega vozila: 10 in; 12 in; 13,5 in; 15 in; 18 in; 6,5 in; 8 in; Drugo
vi: Kích thước loa trầm của xe cơ giới: 10 in; 12 in; 13,5 in; 15 in; 18 in; 6,5 in; 8 in; Khác
en: Motor vehicle subwoofer size: 10 in; 12 in; 13.5 in; 15 in; 18 in; 6.5 in; 8 in; Other
th: ขนาดดอกลำโพงซับวูฟเฟอร์สำหรับรถยนต์: 10 นิ้ว; 12 นิ้ว; 13.5 นิ้ว; 15 นิ้ว; 18 นิ้ว; 6.5 นิ้ว; 8 นิ้ว; อื่นๆ
ja: 自動車用サブウーファーサイズ: 10インチ; 12インチ; 13.5インチ; 15インチ; 18インチ; 6.5インチ; 8インチ; その他
tr: Motorlu araç subwoofer boyutu: 10 inç; 12 inç; 13,5 inç; 15 inç; 18 inç; 6,5 inç; 8 inç; Diğer
fi: Moottoriajoneuvon bassokaiuttimen koko: 10 in; 12 in; 13,5 in; 15 in; 18 in; 6,5 in; 8 in; Muu
pt-BR: Tamanho do subwoofer automotivo: 10 pol.; 12 pol.; 13,5 pol.; 15 pol.; 18 pol.; 6,5 pol.; 8 pol.; Outros
sk-SK: Veľkosť subwoofera motorového vozidla: 10"; 12"; 13,5"; 15"; 18"; 6,5"; 8"; Iné
nl: Subwoofergrootte motorvoertuig: 10 inch; 12 inch; 13,5 inch; 15 inch; 18 inch; 6,5 inch; 8 inch; Overig
el: Μέγεθος subwoofer σε μηχανοκίνητο όχημα: 10 in; 12 in; 13,5 in; 15 in; 18 in; 6,5 in; 8 in; Άλλο
da: Subwooferstørrelse i motorkøretøj: 10 in; 12 in; 13,5 in; 15 in; 18 in; 6,5 in; 8 in; Andet
cs: Velikost subwooferu do motorového vozidla: 10 in; 12 in; 13,5 in; 15 in; 18 in; 6,5 in; 8 in; Jiné
it: Dimensione del subwoofer per veicolo a motore: 10 in; 12 in; 13,5 in; 15 in; 18 in; 6,5 in; 8 in; Altro
es: Tamaño del subwoofers del vehículo a motor: 10 in; 12 in; 13,5 in; 15 in; 18 in; 6,5 in; 8 in; Otro
de: Größe der Subwoofer für Autos: 10 Zoll; 12 Zoll; 13,5 Zoll; 15 Zoll; 18 Zoll; 6,5 Zoll; 8 Zoll; Sonstige
ru: Размер сабвуфера автомобиля: 10 дюймов; 12 дюймов; 13,5 дюйма; 15 дюймов; 18 дюймов; 6,5 дюйма; 8 дюймов; Другое
zh-CN: 汽车重低音扬声器尺寸: 10 英寸; 12 英寸; 13.5 英寸; 15 英寸; 18 英寸; 6.5 英寸; 8 英寸; 其他
fr: Dimensions des subwoofers pour véhicules: 10 po; 12 po; 13,5 po; 15 po; 18 po; 6,5 po; 8 po; Autre
hu: Gépjármű mélynyomó mérete: 10 in; 12 in; 13,5 in; 15 in; 18 in; 6,5 in; 8 in; Egyéb
pt-PT: Tamanho do subwoofer do veículo motorizado: 10 pol.; 12 pol.; 13,5 pol.; 15 pol.; 18 pol.; 6,5 pol.; 8 pol.; Outro
hr-HR: Veličina subwoofera motornog vozila: 10 in; 12 in; 13,5 in; 15 in; 18 in; 6,5 in; 8 in; Ostalo
sv: Storlek på subwoofers för motorfordon: 10 tum; 12 tum; 13,5 tum; 15 tum; 18 tum; 6,5 tum; 8 tum; Övrigt
bg-BG: Размер на субуфера за моторно превозно средство: 10 инча; 12 инча; 13,5 инча; 15 инча; 18 инча; 6,5 инча; 8 инча; Друго
ko: 자동차 서브우퍼 크기: 10인치; 12인치; 13.5인치; 15인치; 18인치; 6.5인치; 8인치; 기타